Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 5

Comprehensive Alcohol, Tobacco and Other Drug Prevention Program Act

33-10-501. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Comprehensive Alcohol, Tobacco and Other Drug Prevention Program Act.”

Acts 2005, ch. 484, § 2; 2009, ch. 186, § 40; T.C.A. § 68-1-601.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 40 purported to transfer this section from § 68-1-601 to § 33-10-601; however, § 68-1-601 was transferred to § 33-10-501 by the code commission.

33-10-502. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services; and

“Department” means the department of mental health and substance abuse services.

Acts 2005, ch. 484, § 3; 2009, ch. 186, § 41; T.C.A. § 68-1-602; Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 24; 2012, ch. 575, §§ 1, 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 41 purported to transfer this section from § 68-1-602 to § 33-10-602; however, § 68-1-602 was transferred to § 33-10-502 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-10-503. Creation of the comprehensive alcohol, tobacco and other drug prevention program grant.

There is created, within the department, the comprehensive alcohol, tobacco and other drug prevention program grant.

Acts 2005, ch. 484, § 4; 2009, ch. 186, § 42; T.C.A. § 68-1-603; Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 24.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 42 purported to transfer this section from § 68-1-603 to § 33-10-603; however, § 68-1-603 was transferred to § 33-10-503 by the code commission.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health (now commissioner of mental health and substance abuse services), the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

33-10-504. Grants for tools to aid youth in resisting pressure to use alcohol, tobacco and drugs.

Subject to the availability of funding in the general appropriations act, grants shall be provided in such amounts as determined by the commissioner to organizations that have or that develop a resistance training/social skills program to provide the necessary tools to the youth of this state, to aid them in successfully resisting peer and media pressures to use alcohol, tobacco and other drugs and to understand the physical and social changes taking place in their lives.

In order to qualify for a grant, the components of a program offered by an organization must, at a minimum, have:

An in-service training that provides staff and volunteers with an overview of the program and suggests ways to incorporate the prevention message into any other programs offered by the organization;

A skills development program for boys and girls six (6) to nine (9) years of age. The program focus on this age group shall be on self-awareness, decision-making and interpersonal skills, while communicating age-appropriate information about alcohol, tobacco and other drugs;

A resistance skills program for youth nine (9) to twelve (12) years of age that focuses on ways to identify and resist peer, social and media pressures to use alcohol, tobacco and other drugs;

A social skills program for adolescents thirteen (13) to fifteen (15) years of age, that teaches resistance skills, stresses reduction techniques, communication skills, assertiveness training and life planning and that provides accurate information about alcohol, tobacco and other drug use;

A program for parents that emphasizes communication skills and factual information about alcohol, tobacco and other drug use; and

A plan that implements community service projects in which youth and adults work as a team, the end result of which enhances the self-esteem of the participating youth and gives them a sense of accomplishment and a sense of belonging to the community.

If the program of an organization provides some, but not all, of these components, then, in the discretion of the commissioner, the organization may qualify for a percentage of the grant that equates to the percentage of the components the organization offers.

Acts 2005, ch. 484, § 5; 2009, ch. 186, § 43; T.C.A. § 68-1-604.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 43 purported to transfer this section from § 68-1-604 to § 33-10-604; however, § 68-1-604 was transferred to § 33-10-504 by the code commission.

33-10-505. Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner shall develop:

The criteria for determining how available funds for grants shall be disbursed to qualifying organizations; and

The application and appeals process for issuing the grants.

Acts 2005, ch. 484, § 6; 2009, ch. 186, § 44; T.C.A. § 68-1-605.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 44 purported to transfer this section from § 68-1-605 to § 33-10-605; however, § 68-1-605 was transferred to § 33-10-505 by the code commission.

33-10-506. Authority.

The commissioner is authorized to take any necessary action, subject to this title, in order to effectuate the purposes of this part.

Acts 2005, ch. 484, § 6; 2009, ch. 186, § 45; T.C.A. § 68-1-606.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2009, ch. 186, § 45 purported to transfer this section from § 68-1-606 to § 33-10-606; however, § 68-1-606 was transferred to § 33-10-506 by the code commission.